Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2215
Real property appraisal practice, defined.

Real property appraisal practice means any act or process performed by a real property appraiser involved in developing and reporting an analysis, opinion, or conclusion relating to the specified interests in or aspects of identified real estate or real property or an appraisal review. Real property appraisal practice includes, but is not limited to, evaluation assignments, valuation assignments, and appraisal review assignments.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 33;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 29;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 22;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 63.